Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 55 Military Leases of Motor Vehicles

6-55-1.
Lease of motor vehicle by active duty armed forces member — Unilateral termination of lease under certain circumstances.

A lease of a motor vehicle used, or intended to be used, by a servicemember, or a servicemember’s dependents, may be unilaterally terminated if:

The lease is executed by or on behalf of a person who thereafter, and during the term of the lease, enters military service under a call or order specifying a period of not less than one hundred eighty (180) days, or who enters military service under a call or order specifying a period of one hundred eighty (180) days or less, and who, without a break in service, receives orders extending the period of military service to a period of not less than one hundred eighty (180) days; or

The servicemember, while in military service, executes the lease and thereafter receives military orders for a change of permanent station to a location outside the continental United States or to deploy with a military unit, or as an individual in support of a military operation, for a period of not less than one hundred eighty (180) days.

The date of the termination of the lease shall be effective only upon:

The delivery of written notice of the termination from the lessee and a copy of the servicemember’s military orders to the lessor (or the lessor’s grantee), or to the lessor’s agent (or the agent’s grantee); and

The motor vehicle is returned by the lessee to the lessor (or the lessor’s grantee), or to the lessor’s agent (or the agent’s grantee), not later than fifteen (15) days after the date of the delivery of written notice.

Upon termination, the lessor may not impose an early termination charge, but the lessee shall be responsible for the prorated amount of the lease due for the period preceding the effective date of the lease termination, including any taxes, summonses, title, and registration fees, or other obligations and liabilities of the lessee in accordance with the terms of the lease, including reasonable charges to the lessee for excess wear or use and mileage, that are due and unpaid at the time of termination of the lease.

Joint leases. A lessee’s termination of a lease pursuant to this section shall terminate any obligation a dependent of the lessee may have under the lease.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 237, § 1.